Maine, session 132, LD1797.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §408-A, sub-§4, as repealed and replaced by PL 2015, c. 494, Pt.
A, §1, is amended to read:
4. Refusals; denials. If a body or an agency or official having custody or control of
any public record refuses permission to inspect or copy or abstract a public record, the body
or agency or official shall provide, within 5 working days of the receipt of the request for
inspection or copying, written notice of the denial, stating the reason for the denial or the
expectation that the request will be denied in full or in part following a review. A written
notice of a denial must contain a citation to the statutory authority used as the basis for the
denial. A request for inspection or copying may be denied, in whole or in part, on the basis
that the request is unduly burdensome or oppressive if the procedures established in
subsection 4‑A are followed. Failure to comply with this subsection is considered failure
to allow inspection or copying and is subject to appeal as provided in section 409.
Page 1 - 132LR2469(02)